Washington statutes.
RCW 35.86.050

Procedure to establish—Plan, surveys, hearings.

In the establishment of off-street parking space and/or facilities, cities shall proceed with the development of the plan therefor by making such economic and physical surveys as are necessary, shall prepare comprehensive plans therefor, and shall hold a public hearing thereon prior to the adoption of any ordinances relating to the leasing or acquisition of property and providing for the financing thereof for this purpose.

[ 1965 c 7 s 35.86.050. Prior: 1959 c 302 s 5.]